Texas, session 891, HB266.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Subchapter B, Chapter 305, Government Code, is amended by adding Section 305.0301 to read as follows: Sec. 305.0301.  PROHIBITED REPRESENTATION OF CERTAIN CLIENTS. (a) In this section, "political subdivision" has the meaning assigned by Section 305.026. (b)  A registrant may not represent, including under a contract, a client that is: (1)  a political subdivision that imposes a tax; (2)  a member of the governing body of a political subdivision described by Subdivision (1); or (3)  a nonprofit association or organization that primarily represents persons described by Subdivision (1) or (2). SECTION 2.  Section 305.0301, Government Code, as added by this Act, applies only to a contract for the representation of a client described by that section that is entered into on or after the effective date of this Act. SECTION 3.  This Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.